Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2599.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin NEW PRAGUE; PUBLIC SAFETY CENTER.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $11,500,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the commissioner of public safety for a grant to the city of New Prague to construct, renovate, furnish, and equip an expansion of the existing fire hall in the city of New Prague to create a centralized public safety center to provide fire, police, and ambulance services to the city of New Prague and communities in the surrounding area. This appropriation is not available until the commissioner of management and budget determines that at least $11,500,000 has been committed to the project from nonstate sources. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $11,500,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end